Washington statutes.
RCW 4.08.110

Action by public corporations.

An action at law may be maintained by any county, incorporated town, school district or other public corporation of like character, in its corporate name, and upon a cause of action accruing to it, in its corporate character and not otherwise, in any of the following cases:

(1) Upon a contract made with such public corporation;

(2) Upon a liability prescribed by law in favor of such public corporation;

(3) To recover a penalty or forfeiture given to such public corporation;

(4) To recover damages for an injury to the corporate rights or property of such public corporation.

[ 1953 c 118 s 1. Prior: Code 1881 s 661; 1869 p 154 s 601; RRS s 950.]